Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 497.061 is amended to read:
497.061. (1) Except as otherwise provided [ for] by law, the  State Fish and Wildlife Commission
shall charge the fees  listed in the fee schedule under this section for the issuance of the specified
licenses, tags and permits.
(2) Fee Schedule:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Prices shown include agent fees
under ORS 497.022 and dedications
of funds collected as otherwise
prescribed by law. Resident Nonresident Statutory
Fee Fee Reference
HUNTING LICENSES
ANNUAL HUNTING LICENSE $34.50 $172.00 497.102
RESIDENT SENIOR HUNTING LICENSE $22.00 - 497.102
RESIDENT DISABLED VET HUNTER LICENSE FREE - 497.102
RESIDENT UNIFORMED SERVICES
HUNTER LICENSE $17.00 - 497.102
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY BIRD LICENSE - $32.50 497.102
HUNTING TAGS/VALIDATIONS
DEER TAG $28.50 $443.50 497.112
ELK TAG $49.50 $588.00 497.112
SPECIAL ELK TAG (DV/PIONEER) $26.00 - 497.112
BLACK BEAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
TURKEY TAG $26.50 $90.00 497.112
ANTELOPE TAG $51.50 $395.50 497.112
MOUNTAIN SHEEP TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
COUGAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 1
MOUNTAIN GOAT TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
RESIDENT UPLAND BIRD STAMP $10.00 - 497.153
RESIDENT WATERFOWL STAMP $13.50 - 497.151
NONRESIDENT BIRD-WATERFOWL STAMP - $44.50 497.156
FISHING LICENSES/VALIDATIONS
ANNUAL ANGLING LICENSE $44.00 $110.50 497.121
RESIDENT SENIOR ANGLING LICENSE $29.00 - 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET ANGLER LICENSE FREE - 497.121
[ONE-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $23.00 $23.00 497.121]
ONE-DAY ANGLING AND SHELLFISH LICENSE [$32.50 $32.50 497.121]
$23.00 $23.00 497.121
TWO-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $42.00 $42.00 497.121
THREE-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $59.50 $59.50 497.121
NONRESIDENT SEVEN-DAY ANGLING LICENSE - $93.50 497.121
ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $46.00 $66.00 497.121
HATCHERY HARVEST TAG $33.00 $33.00 497.121
TWO-ROD ANGLING LICENSE $28.00 $28.00 497.121
SHELLFISH LICENSES
ANNUAL SHELLFISH LICENSE $10.00 $28.00 497.121
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY SHELLFISH LICENSE - $19.00 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET SHELLFISH LICENSE FREE - 497.121
COMBINATION LICENSE $73.00 - 497.132
RESIDENT SPORTSPAC LICENSE $196.50 - 497.132
RESIDENT SENIOR COMBINATION LICENSE $47.50 - 497.132
RESIDENT PIONEER COMBINATION LICENSE $6.00 - 497.132
YOUTH LICENSES/VALIDATIONS (ages 12-17)
YOUTH LICENSE $10.00 $10.00 497.127
RESIDENT YOUTH SPORTSPAC LICENSE $55.00 - 497.132
YOUTH ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $5.00 $5.00 497.121
YOUTH UPLAND BIRD STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.153
YOUTH WATERFOWL STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.151
YOUTH TURKEY TAG $10.50 $10.50 497.112
YOUTH HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $17.00 $17.00 497.142
MISCELLANEOUS
DUPLICATE CERTIFICATE FILING $25.50 $25.50 497.032
GUIDE TAG — DEER - $575.00 497.112
GUIDE TAG — ELK - $848.00 497.112
RESIDENT HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $54.50 - 497.142
NONRESIDENT FUR-TAKERS HUNT/TRAP LICENSE - $407.00 497.142
RESIDENT HUNT FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $26.00 - 497.142
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE PERMIT $6.50 $14.00 497.102
OUTDOOR CLUB LICENSE $100.00 $100.00 498.418
LOP REGISTRATION $35.00 $35.00 496.146
LOP TAG REDISTRIBUTION $17.00 $17.00 496.146
RSC STEELHEAD VALIDATION $2.00 $4.00 497.121
RSC WILD STEELHEAD HARVEST CARD $10.00 $20.00 497.121
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 2
OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES/PERMITS
FUR DEALER LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
TAXIDERMIST LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
WILDLIFE PROPAGATION LICENSE $58.00 - 497.258
FISH PROPAGATION LICENSE $151.50 - 497.258
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE LICENSE $232.00 - 497.258
STURGEON PROPAGATION PERMIT $3,573.00 $3,573.00 497.325
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 2.  ORS 497.061, as amended by section  61, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
497.061. (1) Except as otherwise provided [ for] by law, the  State Fish and Wildlife Commission
shall charge the fees  listed in the fee schedule under this section for the issuance of the specified
licenses, tags and permits.
(2) Fee Schedule:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Prices shown include agent fees
under ORS 497.022 and dedications
of funds collected as otherwise
prescribed by law. Resident Nonresident Statutory
Fee Fee Reference
HUNTING LICENSES
ANNUAL HUNTING LICENSE $34.50 $172.00 497.102
RESIDENT SENIOR HUNTING LICENSE $22.00 - 497.102
RESIDENT DISABLED VET HUNTER LICENSE FREE - 497.102
RESIDENT UNIFORMED SERVICES
HUNTER LICENSE $17.00 - 497.102
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY BIRD LICENSE - $32.50 497.102
HUNTING TAGS/VALIDATIONS
DEER TAG $28.50 $443.50 497.112
ELK TAG $49.50 $588.00 497.112
SPECIAL ELK TAG (DV/PIONEER) $26.00 - 497.112
BLACK BEAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
TURKEY TAG $26.50 $90.00 497.112
ANTELOPE TAG $51.50 $395.50 497.112
MOUNTAIN SHEEP TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
COUGAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
MOUNTAIN GOAT TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
RESIDENT UPLAND BIRD STAMP $10.00 - 497.153
RESIDENT WATERFOWL STAMP $13.50 - 497.151
NONRESIDENT BIRD-WATERFOWL STAMP - $44.50 497.156
FISHING LICENSES/VALIDATIONS
ANNUAL ANGLING LICENSE $43.00 $109.00 497.121
RESIDENT SENIOR ANGLING LICENSE $29.00 - 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET ANGLER LICENSE FREE - 497.121
[ONE-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $22.50 $22.50 497.121]
ONE-DAY ANGLING AND SHELLFISH LICENSE [$32.50 $32.50 497.121]
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 3
$23.00 $23.00 497.121
TWO-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $42.00 $42.00 497.121
THREE-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $59.50 $59.50 497.121
NONRESIDENT SEVEN-DAY ANGLING LICENSE - $92.00 497.121
ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $46.00 $66.00 497.121
HATCHERY HARVEST TAG $33.00 $33.00 497.121
TWO-ROD ANGLING LICENSE $28.00 $28.00 497.121
SHELLFISH LICENSES
ANNUAL SHELLFISH LICENSE $10.00 $28.00 497.121
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY SHELLFISH LICENSE - $19.00 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET SHELLFISH LICENSE FREE - 497.121
COMBINATION LICENSE $72.00 - 497.132
RESIDENT SPORTSPAC LICENSE $196.50 - 497.132
RESIDENT SENIOR COMBINATION LICENSE $47.50 - 497.132
RESIDENT PIONEER COMBINATION LICENSE $6.00 - 497.132
YOUTH LICENSES/VALIDATIONS (ages 12-17)
YOUTH LICENSE $10.00 $10.00 497.127
RESIDENT YOUTH SPORTSPAC LICENSE $55.00 - 497.132
YOUTH ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $5.00 $5.00 497.121
YOUTH UPLAND BIRD STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.153
YOUTH WATERFOWL STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.151
YOUTH TURKEY TAG $10.50 $10.50 497.112
YOUTH HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $17.00 $17.00 497.142
MISCELLANEOUS
DUPLICATE CERTIFICATE FILING $25.50 $25.50 497.032
GUIDE TAG — DEER - $575.00 497.112
GUIDE TAG — ELK - $848.00 497.112
RESIDENT HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $54.50 - 497.142
NONRESIDENT FUR-TAKERS HUNT/TRAP LICENSE - $407.00 497.142
RESIDENT HUNT FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $26.00 - 497.142
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE PERMIT $6.50 $14.00 497.102
OUTDOOR CLUB LICENSE $100.00 $100.00 498.418
LOP REGISTRATION $35.00 $35.00 496.146
LOP TAG REDISTRIBUTION $17.00 $17.00 496.146
RSC STEELHEAD VALIDATION $2.00 $4.00 497.121
RSC WILD STEELHEAD HARVEST CARD $10.00 $20.00 497.121
OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES/PERMITS
FUR DEALER LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
TAXIDERMIST LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
WILDLIFE PROPAGATION LICENSE $58.00 - 497.258
FISH PROPAGATION LICENSE $151.50 - 497.258
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE LICENSE $232.00 - 497.258
STURGEON PROPAGATION PERMIT $3,573.00 $3,573.00 497.325
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 3.
 ORS 497.121 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 4
497.121. (1) The  State Fish and Wildlife Commission [ is authorized to issue, upon application, ]
may, upon application and payment of the applicable fees  established by the fee schedule
under ORS 497.061, issue the following licenses and  tags  to persons desiring to angle for fish
or take shellfish [ the following licenses and tags and  shall charge the applicable fees under the fee
schedule in ORS 497.061 ]:
(a) Resident annual angling license.
(b) Nonresident annual angling license.
(c) Nonresident angling license to angle for seven consecutive days.
[(d) Angling license to angle for one day. ]
[(e)] (d) Angling and shellfish license to angle and take shellfish for one day.
[(f)] (e)  Angling license to angle for two days.
[(g)] (f)  Angling license to angle for three days.
[(h)] (g)  Resident annual shellfish license.
[(i)] (h)  Nonresident annual shellfish license.
[(j)] (i) Nonresident three-day shellfish license.
[(k)] (j)  Two rod angling license for anglers who also hold a valid annual angling license.
[(L)] (k)  Resident annual senior citizen angling  license for persons 70 years of age or older who
have resided in the state for not less than five years prior to the date of application.
[(m)] (L)  Resident disabled  veteran angling license for a person who files with the commission
written proof that the last official certification of record by  the United States Department of Vet-
erans Affairs or by any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States shows the  person to be
at least 25 percent disabled.
[(n)] (m)  Resident disabled veteran shellfish license for a person who files  with the commission
written proof that the last official certification  of record by the United States Department of Vet-
erans Affairs or by  any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States shows the person to be
at least 25 percent disabled.
[(o)] (n) Resident annual combined angling tag to angle for salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and
halibut.
[(p)] (o) Nonresident annual combined angling tag to angle for salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon
and halibut.
[(q)] (p)  Annual youth  combined angling tag for persons under 18 years of age to angle for
salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut.
[(r)] (q) Renewable tag to angle for hatchery salmon and steelhead.
(r) Rogue-South Coast steelhead validation.
(s) Rogue-South Coast wild steelhead harvest card.
(2) Any person who holds  a valid permanent angling license for persons who are blind or a
permanent angling  license for persons in a wheelchair issued by the commission before January 1,
2000, need not obtain a resident annual angling license under this section.
(3) The annual combined angling tags  to angle for salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut
referred to in subsection [ (1)(o), (p), (q) and (r) ] (1)(n), (o), (p) and (q) of this section and  the
Rogue-South Coast steelhead validation and Rogue-South Coast  wild steelhead harvest card
referred to in subsection (1)(r) and (s)  of this section are in addition to and not in lieu of  the
angling licenses required by the wildlife laws. However, an annual combined angling tag to angle
for salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and  halibut is not required of a person who holds a valid an-
gling license referred to in subsection (1)(c) to [ (g)] (f)  of this section.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules concerning issuance  of, and requirements related
to, the Rogue-South Coast steelhead validation and the Rogue-South  Coast wild steelhead
harvest card described in subsection (1)(r) and (s) of this section. The rules must  address
when the validation and harvest card are required,  relative to licenses, tags and permits that
are required under the wildlife laws.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of the  wildlife laws, the moneys received from
the sale of the Rogue-South Coast steelhead validation and the  Rogue-South Coast wild
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 5
steelhead harvest card described in subsection (1)(r) and (s) of  this section shall be credited
to the Rogue-South Coast Research and Monitoring  Subaccount established under ORS
496.303.
SECTION 4.  ORS 497.124 is amended to read:
497.124. Notwithstanding any other provision of the wildlife laws, of the moneys received from
the sale of the following licenses, 75 cents from the sale of  each license shall be credited to the Fish
Screening Subaccount under ORS 496.303:
(1) Resident annual combination license issued under ORS 497.132.
(2) Resident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(a).
[(3) Angling license to angle for one day issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(d). ]
[(4)] (3) Angling and shellfish license to angle and  take shellfish for one day issued under ORS
497.121 [(1)(e)] (1)(d).
[(5)] (4) Angling license to angle for two days issued under ORS 497.121 [ (1)(f)] (1)(e).
[(6)] (5) Angling license to angle for three days issued under ORS 497.121 [ (1)(g)] (1)(f) .
[(7)] (6) Nonresident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(b).
[(8)] (7)  Nonresident angling license to  angle for seven consecutive days issued under ORS
497.121 (1)(c).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 497.126 is amended to read:
497.126. Notwithstanding any other provision of the wildlife laws, of the moneys received from
the sale of the following licenses, the following amounts shall be deposited as provided  for in ORS
496.283:
(1) Resident annual combination license issued under ORS 497.132, $4.
(2) Resident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(a), $4.
[(3) Angling license to angle for one day issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(d), $2. ]
[(4)] (3) Angling and shellfish license to angle and  take shellfish for one day issued under ORS
497.121 [(1)(e)] (1)(d), $2.
[(5)] (4) Angling license to angle for two days issued under ORS 497.121 [ (1)(f)] (1)(e) , $2.
[(6)] (5) Angling license to angle for three days issued under ORS 497.121 [ (1)(g)] (1)(f) , $2.
[(7)] (6) Nonresident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(b), $10.
[(8)] (7)  Nonresident angling license to  angle for seven consecutive days issued under ORS
497.121 (1)(c), $5.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 497.138 is amended to read:
497.138. Notwithstanding any other provision of the wildlife laws, of the moneys received from
the sale of the following licenses, 25 cents from the sale of  each license shall be credited to the Fish
Passage Fund established under ORS 497.139:
(1) Resident annual combination hunting and angling license issued under ORS 497.132.
(2) Resident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(a).
[(3) Angling license to angle for one day issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(d). ]
[(4)] (3)  Angling and shellfish license to angle and  take shellfish for one day issued under ORS
497.121 [(1)(e)] (1)(d).
[(5)] (4) Angling license to angle for two days issued under ORS 497.121 [ (1)(f)] (1)(e).
[(6)] (5) Angling license to angle for three days issued under ORS 497.121 [ (1)(g)] (1)(f) .
[(7)] (6) Nonresident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(b).
[(8)] (7)  Nonresident angling license to angle for seven  consecutive days issued under ORS
497.121 (1)(c).
SECTION 7.
 Section 3, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 52, chapter 779,
Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding  any other provision of the wildlife laws and during the period begin-
ning January  1, 2016, and ending December 31, 2026, of the moneys received from the sale of the
following licenses, the following amounts shall  be deposited in the Oregon Hatchery Research Cen-
ter Fund:
(1) Resident annual combination license issued under ORS 497.132, $1.
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 6
(2) Resident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(a), $1.
(3) Angling and shellfish license to angle and take shellfish  for one day issued under ORS
497.121 (1)(d), $0.50.
(4) Nonresident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(b), $1.50.
(5) Nonresident angling license to angle for seven consecutive days issued under ORS 497.121
(1)(c), $1.50.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 496.303 is amended to read:
496.303. (1) The Fish and Wildlife Account is established in the  State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. All moneys in the account  are continuously appropriated to the
State Fish and Wildlife Commission. The Fish  and Wildlife Account shall consist of the moneys in
its various subaccounts and any moneys transferred to the account  by the Legislative Assembly.
Unless otherwise specified by law, interest earnings on moneys in the account shall be paid  into the
State Treasury and credited to the State Wildlife Fund.
(2)(a) The Fish Screening Subaccount is established in the Fish and  Wildlife Account. The sub-
account shall consist of:
(A) All penalties recovered under ORS 536.900 to 536.920.
(B) All moneys received pursuant to ORS 498.306.
(C) All gifts, grants and other moneys from whatever source that may be used to carry  out the
provisions of ORS 498.306.
(D) All moneys received from the sale of angling licenses dedicated by ORS 497.124.
(b) All moneys in the  subaccount shall be used to carry out the provisions of ORS 315.138,
498.306 and 509.620. However, moneys  received from the sale of angling licenses dedicated by ORS
497.124 shall be expended only to carry out the provisions  of law relating to the screening of water
diversions.
(3) The Fish Endowment Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account. The sub-
account shall consist of transfers of moneys authorized by  the Legislative Assembly from the State
Wildlife Fund and gifts and grants of moneys from whatever source for the  purpose of paying the
expense of maintaining fish hatcheries operated by the department.
(4) The Migratory Waterfowl Subaccount  is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. All
moneys received by the commission from the sale of art works and prints related  to the migratory
waterfowl stamps shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the  subaccount may be expended
only for  activities that promote the propagation, conservation and recreational uses of migratory
waterfowl  and  for activities related to the design, production, issuance and arrangements for sale
of the migratory waterfowl stamps and related art works and prints. Expenditures of  moneys in the
subaccount may be made within this state, in other states  or in foreign countries, in such amounts
as the commission determines appropriate. Expenditures in other  states and foreign countries shall
be on such terms and conditions as the commission determines will benefit most directly the mi-
gratory waterfowl resources of this state.
(5) The  Halibut Research Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. Based on
the annual number of recreational halibut anglers, a portion of the moneys  derived from the sale
of the salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut tag pursuant to ORS 497.121 shall be  credited
to the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be expended only  for halibut population studies
and other research.
(6) The Upland Bird Subaccount  is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. All moneys
received by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission  from the sale of upland bird stamps, from the
sale of any  art works and prints related to the upland bird stamps and from private hunting preserve
permit fees shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be expended  only
for promoting the propagation and conservation of upland birds  and the acquisition, development,
management, enhancement, sale or exchange  of upland bird habitat, and for activities related to the
design, production, issuance and arrangements for sale of the upland bird  stamps and related art
works and  prints. Expenditures of moneys in the subaccount shall be made for the benefit of pro-
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 7
grams within this  state in such amounts and at such times as the commission determines appropriate
to most directly benefit the upland bird resources of the state.
(7) The  Access and Habitat Board Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account.
The subaccount shall consist of moneys transferred to the subaccount pursuant  to ORS 496.242.
Moneys in the subaccount may be used for the purposes specified in ORS 496.242.
(8) The Marine Shellfish Subaccount is established in the  Fish and Wildlife Account. Interest
earnings on moneys in the subaccount shall be  credited to the subaccount. All moneys received by
the commission from the sale of  resident and nonresident shellfish licenses pursuant to ORS 497.121
shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount shall be used for the protection and
enhancement of shellfish for recreational  purposes, including shellfish sanitation costs and the cost
of enforcement of wildlife laws pertaining to the taking  of shellfish. The State Fish and Wildlife
Director, or a designee, the Director of Agriculture, or a designee, and the Superintendent of State
Police, or a designee, shall jointly make a recommendation to the  Governor for inclusion in the
Governor’s budget beginning July 1 of each odd-numbered year.
(9)(a) The Mountain Sheep Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys  in the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
sheep, for research,  development, management, enhancement and sale or exchange of mountain
sheep habitat  and for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission most di-
rectly benefit mountain sheep resources of this state.
(10)(a) The Antelope Subaccount is established in the Fish  and Wildlife Account, consisting of
moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall  be used for the propagation and conservation of antelope,
for research, development, management, enhancement and sale or exchange of antelope habitat  and
for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission  most directly benefit antelope
resources of this state.
(11)(a) The Mountain Goat Subaccount is  established in the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys  in the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
goats for research, development, management, enhancement and sale or  exchange of mountain goat
habitat and for programs  within the state that in the discretion of the commission most directly
benefit mountain goat resources of this state.
(12) The commission shall keep a record of all moneys deposited in the Fish  and Wildlife Ac-
count. The record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts the  sources from which the mon-
eys are derived and the individual activity or programs against which each withdrawal is charged.
(13) The Oregon Conservation Strategy Subaccount  is established in the Fish and Wildlife Ac-
count. All moneys received by  the commission from the sale of habitat conservation stamps and from
the sale of any art works and prints related to  the habitat conservation stamp shall be deposited in
the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may  be expended only to promote and implement habitat
and species restoration, enhancement and viewing activities identified in the “Oregon Conservation
Strategy,” 2006, by the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, and for activities related to the de-
sign, production, issuance and arrangements for sale  of the habitat conservation stamps and related
art works and prints.
(14)(a) The Rogue-South Coast  Research and Monitoring Subaccount is established in the
Fish and Wildlife Account, consisting of moneys collected under ORS 497.121 (1)(r) and (s).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be used  for research and monitoring that is con-
sistent with the Rogue-South Coast Multi-Species Conservation  and Management Plan the
commission adopted in December 2021, as subsequently amended by the commission.
(c) The commission may amend the plan as needed.
(d) The commission shall make the current version of the plan publicly  available on a
website of the commission or of the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 8
Passed by House February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-B) Page 9